Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. Applicability; Jurisdiction; Venue; Corporate Affiliates.

Sec. 45.25.010.
Applicability.

AS

45.25.020

—

45.25.310

apply to franchise agreements between a manufacturer and its new motor vehicle dealers in this state.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 50 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 30, 2018, rewrote the section, which read, “AS

45.25.020

—

45.25.320

apply to franchise contracts between a manufacturer and its new motor vehicle dealers in this state.”

Sec. 45.25.020.
Jurisdiction; venue.

The courts of this state have jurisdiction over a legal dispute between a manufacturer located in or outside this state and a new motor vehicle dealer located in this state, and the dispute is governed by and interpreted and adjudicated under the law of this state.

Venue for a dispute under (a) of this section is in the judicial district of this state where the new motor vehicle dealer’s principal place of business is located.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

For the effect of subsection (b) on Rule 3, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 14, ch. 79, SLA 2002, in the 2002 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 45.25.030.
Corporate affiliates.

A manufacturer may not use a subsidiary corporation, affiliated corporation, partnership, association, or other person to accomplish what would be prohibited for the manufacturer under this chapter.

This section does not limit the right of a person included within the scope of this section to engage in reasonable and appropriate business practices consistent with an existing trade practice that is not prohibited by this chapter.

History.

(§ 9 ch 79 SLA 2002)